Utah statutes.
34A-2-201.3 (Superseded 07/01/10).   Direct payments prohibited except by
self-insured employer.
(1)  An employer who is not a self-insured employer, as defined in Section
34A-2-201.5, may not pay a benefit provided for under this chapter and Chapter
3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, directly:
(a)  to an employee; or
(b)  for the employee.
(2) (a)  Subject to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if
the division finds that an employer is violating or has violated Subsection
(1), the division shall send written notice to the employer of the
requirements of this section and Section 34A-2-201.
(b)  The division shall send the notice described in Subsection (2)(a) to the
last address on the records of the commission for the employer.
(3) (a)  If, after the division mails the notice required by Subsection (2) to
an employer, the employer again violates Subsection (1), the division may
impose a penalty against the employer of up to $1,000 for each violation.
(b)  If, after the division imposes a penalty under Subsection (3)(a) against
the employer, the employer again violates Subsection (1), the division may
impose a penalty of up to $5,000 for each violation.
(4)  The division shall deposit a penalty imposed under Subsection (3) into
the Uninsured Employers' Fund created by Section 34A-2-704 to be used for the
purposes of that fund.
(5)  A penalty under this section is in addition to any other penalty imposed
under this chapter or Chapter 3 against an employer who fails to comply with
Section 34A-2-201.
(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.
